New Jersey, session 222, S2102.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 4 of P.L.1967, c.237 (C.39:3-76.5) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a.  A person operating a motorcycle shall ride only upon the permanent and regular seat attached thereto, and such operator shall not carry any other person nor shall any other person ride on a motorcycle unless such motorcycle is designed to carry more than one person, in which event a passenger may ride upon the permanent and regular seat if designed for two persons, or upon another seat firmly attached to the rear or side of the operator.  A passenger shall ride astride on a motorcycle only if the feet of that passenger rest firmly upon the footrests attached to the motorcycle as required by subsection b. of this section.  A passenger on a motorcycle, whether riding astride or in a sidecar attached to the motorcycle, shall wear a securely fitted helmet of a size proper for that passenger as required under section 6 of [P.L.1967, c.237 (C. 39:3-76.7)] P.L.1967, c.237 (C.39:3-76.7).  A passenger on a motorcycle, whether riding astride or in a sidecar attached to the motorcycle, shall be 10 years of age or older. A motorcycle operator who carries a passenger in violation of this subsection shall be fined not less than $50.00 [nor] or more than $100.00. b.    Motorcycles designed to carry more than one person shall be equipped with adequate footrests for each passenger.  Seats and footrests shall be of a type approved by the [director] chief administrator.  Handholds shall be required only insofar as they are necessary to comply with federal regulations. (cf: P.L.1985, c.15, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.